tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-nl.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see lang-nl.rme

% used: a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s t u v w

\hyphenation{
aan-dachts-trek-ker
aan-dachts-trek-kers
acht-en-der
acht-en-ders
acht-en-der-tig
acht-en-der-tig-ste
be-heers-ta-ken
be-scherm-en-gel
be-scherm-en-ge-len
be-stuurs-la-gen
be-stuurs-ta-ken
bij-stands-trek-ker
bij-stands-trek-kers
bui-ten-an-ten-ne
bui-ten-an-ten-nes
don-der-aal
han-dels-taal
her-e-nen
ket-ting-ste-ken
lands-taal
meest-al
mi-nis-ters-por-te-feuil-le
mi-nis-ters-por-te-feuil-les
ont-hoof-din-gen
pa-ling-ste-ken
rechts-taal
schil-ders-ta-lent
sou-ve-niertje
sou-ve-niertjes
spie-gel-ei
ver-en-gels-te
ver-hol-lands-te
ver-in-lands-te
ver-kinds-te
ver-ne-der-lands-te
ver-rechts-te
ver-steeds-te
wals-te
wa-ter-staats-in-ge-ni-eur
wa-ter-staats-in-ge-ni-eurs}
